Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
SUPERVISED LOANS AND
SUPERVISED LENDERS

5-2-301. Authority to make supervised loans.

Unless a person is a supervised financial organization or has first obtained a license from the administrator authorizing him or her to make supervised loans, he or she shall not engage in the business of:

Making supervised loans or undertaking direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against consumers arising from supervised loans he or she has previously made; or

Taking assignments of and undertaking direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against consumers arising from supervised loans; except that a person who is licensed by the administrator as a collection agency pursuant to article 16 of this title 5 or is licensed by the Colorado supreme court to practice law, and who takes assignment of supervised loans only after such loans are in default, is not required to obtain a supervised lender license to engage in the activities described in this subsection (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1206, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 530, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1170, § 6, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-502, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-302. License to make supervised loans - rules - definition.

The administrator shall receive and act on all applications for licenses to make supervised loans under this code. Applications shall be filed in the manner prescribed by the administrator and shall contain such information as the administrator may reasonably require. No license shall be issued without payment of a nonrefundable license fee. The license year shall be the calendar year.

No license shall be issued unless the administrator, upon investigation, finds that the financial responsibility, character, and fitness of the applicant and of the members, managers, partners, officers, and directors thereof are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this code. In determining financial responsibility of an applicant proposing to engage in making consumer insurance premium loans, the administrator shall consider the liabilities the lender may incur for erroneous cancellation of insurance. The administrator may deny an application for licensure for any of the grounds provided in section 5-2-303.

Upon written request, the applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of the applicant's qualifications for a license if:

The administrator has notified the applicant in writing that his or her application has been denied; or

The administrator has not issued a license within sixty days after the application for the license was filed.

A request for a hearing may not be made more than sixty days after the administrator has mailed a writing to the applicant notifying the applicant that the application has been denied and stating in substance the administrator's findings supporting denial of the application.

If a supervised lender has more than one place of business, it must obtain a master license. The administrator may authorize the addition of branch locations to the master license. A separate license fee and proof of financial responsibility shall be required for each authorized branch location. Each master license and branch location license shall remain in full force and effect until surrendered, suspended, or revoked.

The application for approval of a branch location license may be more abbreviated than the application for a new or master supervised lender's license. An application for a branch location license may be filed by any means, including facsimile or electronic filing, followed by the license fee required by this section.

Upon receipt of a completed branch location license application and the required license fee, the branch location is automatically licensed for a temporary period not to exceed one hundred twenty days. If the administrator does not deny the branch location application on or before the end of that period, the temporary branch location license shall become permanent. The administrator may deny an application for a branch location for any of the grounds provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 5-2-303.

The administrator's approval of an additional branch location license may be provided by letter. No license certificate need be issued for a licensed branch location. All provisions of this part 3 relating to licenses apply equally to branch location licenses.

No licensee shall change the location of any place of business or license without giving the administrator at least fifteen days prior written notice. The administrator may by rule promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establish an administrative fee for such a change of address.

Except as provided in subsection (7)(b) of this section, a licensee shall not engage in the business of making supervised loans at any place of business for which the licensee does not hold a license, nor shall a licensee engage in business under any other name than that in the license. The administrator may, by rule, establish an administrative fee for such a change of name. For the purposes of this subsection (7), a consumer insurance premium loan is made at the lender's business office.

Subject to rules adopted by the administrator, nothing in this part 3 prohibits a licensee from permitting its employees to work from a remote location so long as the licensee:

Ensures that no in-person customer interactions are conducted at the remote location and does not designate the remote location to consumers as a business location;

Maintains appropriate safeguards for licensee and consumer data, information, and records, including the use of secure virtual private networks, also known as "VPNs", where appropriate;

Employs appropriate risk-based monitoring and oversight processes of work performed from a remote location and maintains records of the monitoring and oversight processes;

Ensures consumer information and records are not maintained at a remote location;

Ensures consumer and licensee information and records remain accessible and available for regulatory oversight and examination; and

Provides appropriate employee training to ensure employees working from a remote location keep all conversations about and with consumers that are conducted from the remote location confidential, as if conducted from a commercial location, and to ensure that employees working at a remote location work in an environment that is conducive and appropriate to ensuring privacy and confidential conversations.

As used in this subsection (7)(b), "remote location" means a private residence of an employee of a licensee or another location selected by the employee and approved by the licensee.

Each license shall be renewed by payment of a nonrefundable license fee and the filing of a renewal form. The fee and renewal form shall be due each January 31. If a licensee fails to pay the prescribed fee on or before March 1, it shall pay a penalty of five dollars per day per license from March 2 to the date the payment is postmarked. However, if a licensee fails to pay the appropriate renewal and penalty fees by March 15, its license shall automatically expire.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 157, § 3, effective January 1, 2010.)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (8), and (9) amended, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 157, § 3, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2022:

(7) amended, (HB 22-1410), ch. 404, p. 2872, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-3-503 and 5-6-203, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-2-303. Denial and discipline of license.

The administrator may deny an application for a license or take disciplinary action against a person licensed to make supervised loans if the administrator finds that:

The applicant or licensee has violated this code or any rule or order lawfully made pursuant thereto;

Facts or conditions exist that would clearly have justified the administrator in refusing to grant a license had these facts or conditions been known to exist at the time the application for the license was made;

The applicant has failed to complete an application for licensure;

The applicant or licensee has failed to provide information required by the administrator within a reasonable time as fixed by the administrator;

The applicant or licensee has failed to provide or maintain proof of financial responsibility;

The applicant or licensee is insolvent;

The applicant or licensee has made, in any document or statement filed with the administrator, a false representation of a material fact or has omitted to state a material fact;

The applicant, licensee, or its owners, partners, members, officers, or directors have been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a crime specified in part 4 of article 4 of title 18, C.R.S., or in part 1, 2, 3, 5, or 7 of article 5 of title 18, C.R.S., to a crime involving fraud or deceit, or to any similar crime under the jurisdiction of any federal court or court of another state;

The applicant or licensee has failed to make, maintain, or produce records which comply with section 5-2-304 and any regulation adopted by the administrator;

The applicant or licensee has been the subject of any disciplinary action by any state or federal agency;

A final judgment has been entered against the applicant or licensee for violations of this code, any state or federal law concerning consumer finance, banking, or mortgage brokers or lenders, or any state or federal law prohibiting deceptive or unfair trade or business practices; or

The applicant or licensee has failed to, in a timely manner as fixed by the administrator, take or provide proof of the corrective action required by the administrator subsequent to an examination or investigation pursuant to section 5-2-305 or 5-6-106.

The administrator may summarily suspend a license as provided in section 24-4-104, C.R.S.

Whenever the administrator denies a license application or takes disciplinary action pursuant to this section, the administrator shall enter an order to that effect and notify the licensee or applicant of the denial or disciplinary action. The notification required by this subsection (3) shall be given by personal service or by mail to the last known address of the licensee or applicant as shown on the application, license, or as subsequently furnished in writing to the administrator.

Any person holding a license to make supervised loans may relinquish the license by notifying the administrator in writing of its relinquishment. The revocation, suspension, expiration, or relinquishment of a license shall not affect the licensee's liability for acts previously committed nor impair the administrator's ability to issue a final agency order or impose discipline against the licensee.

No revocation, suspension, or relinquishment of a license shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any consumer.

The administrator may reinstate a license, terminate a suspension, or grant a new license to a person whose license has been revoked or suspended if no fact or condition then exists that clearly would have justified the administrator in refusing to grant a license.

After a finding of one or more of the conditions stated in subsection (1) of this section, the administrator may take any or all of the following actions:

Deny an application for licensure including an application for a branch office license;

Revoke the license;

Suspend the license for a period of time;

Issue an order to the licensee to cease and desist from such acts;

Order the licensee to make refunds to consumers of excess charges under this code;

Impose penalties of up to a maximum of one thousand dollars for each violation all or part of which may be specifically designated for consumer and creditor educational expenses;

Bar the person from applying for or holding a license for a period of five years following revocation of his or her license;

Issue a letter of admonition; or

Impose a penalty of two hundred dollars per day for failure to make, produce, or retain records required to be maintained under this code within forty-eight hours after the administrator's written demand. If the administrator has provided advance written notice of forty-eight hours or more to a licensee prior to conducting an examination pursuant to section 5-2-305, the penalty may be imposed without allowing additional time.

The discipline stated in paragraphs (h) and (i) of subsection (7) of this section may be imposed without a hearing, but the licensee may, within thirty days thereafter, file with the administrator a written notice requesting a hearing. If such request is timely made, the letter of admonition shall be deemed vacated and a hearing shall be held. If, after such hearing, there is a finding that one or more of the grounds for discipline exist, any or all of the forms of discipline listed in this section may be imposed.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1209, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1892, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-3-503 and 5-3-504, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-2-304. Records - annual reports - proof of financial responsibility.

Every licensee shall maintain records in conformity with this code, rules adopted thereunder, and generally accepted accounting principles and practices in a manner that will enable the administrator to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this code. The record-keeping system of a licensee shall be sufficient if the licensee makes the required information reasonably available. The records need not be kept in the place of business where supervised loans are made if the administrator is given free access to the records wherever located. The records pertaining to any loan need not be preserved for more than four years after making the final entry relating to the loan, but, in the case of a revolving loan account, the four years is measured from the date of each entry.

On or before June 1 of each year, every licensee shall file with the administrator an annual report in the form prescribed by the administrator relating to all supervised loans made by the licensee, which report shall also demonstrate satisfactory proof of the licensee's financial responsibility. At all other times, the licensee shall maintain satisfactory proof of financial responsibility. The administrator shall consult with comparable officials in other states for the purpose of making the kinds of information required in annual reports uniform among the states. Information contained in annual reports shall be confidential and may be published only in composite form. The administrator may, by rule, determine the types and amounts of financial responsibility deemed to be satisfactory.

If a licensee fails to file the annual report or proof of financial responsibility by July 1, the administrator may impose a penalty of five dollars per day from July 2 to the date the filing is postmarked. However, if a licensee fails to file and pay the appropriate penalty by July 15, or, at all other times, fails to provide satisfactory proof of financial responsibility within thirty days after receiving notice from the administrator, its license shall automatically expire.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1211, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1893, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-505, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-305. Examinations and investigations.

The administrator shall examine periodically, at intervals the administrator deems appropriate, the loans, business, and records of every licensee. In addition, for the purpose of discovering violations of this code or securing information lawfully required, the administrator or, in lieu thereof, the official or agency to whose supervision the organization is subject pursuant to section 5-6-105, may at any time investigate the loans, business, and records of any supervised lender or any supervised financial organization. For these purposes the administrator shall have free and reasonable access to the offices, places of business, and records of the lender.

If the lender's records are located outside this state, the lender shall, at the lender's option, either make them available to the administrator at a convenient location within this state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the administrator or the administrator's representative to examine them at the place where they are maintained; except that the lender shall make the records available for examination at the administrator's office or at any other location the administrator deems appropriate, at the cost of the lender, if the administrator determines that the examination of the records at the location where the records are maintained endangers the safety of the administrator's representative or that there are not adequate facilities at the location where the records are maintained to conduct the examination. The administrator may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on the administrator's behalf.

The administrator may require any lender whose records are located within the state to make its records available for examination at the administrator's office or at any other location the administrator deems appropriate at the cost of the lender if the administrator determines that the examination of the records at the location where the records are maintained endangers the safety of the administrator's representative or that there are not adequate facilities at the location where the records are maintained to conduct the examination.

For the purposes of this section, the administrator may administer oaths or affirmations, and, upon the administrator's own motion or upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, adduce evidence, and require the production of any matter that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

Upon failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony, the administrator may apply to the district court in the city and county of Denver for an order compelling compliance.

After the administrator has examined a licensee pursuant to this section, the administrator shall provide a report of the examination to the licensee and request the licensee to take the corrective action required therein. The licensee shall, within a time and manner as fixed by the administrator, take the corrective action required in the report and provide proof that the corrective action was taken. The corrective action required may include refunds of excess charges and corrections of disclosures required by this code. This subsection (5) does not require the administrator to allow a licensee to take corrective action prior to the administrator filing legal or administrative action for repeated or willful violations of this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1211, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-506, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-306. Administrative procedures - applicability.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of sections 24-4-102 to 24-4-106, C.R.S., apply to and govern all rules promulgated and all administrative action taken by the administrator pursuant to this code; except that section 24-4-104 (3), C.R.S., shall not apply to any such action.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-507, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-307. Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by any final action or order of the administrator and affected thereby is entitled to a review thereof by the court of appeals by appropriate proceedings under section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-6-107 and 5-6-108, as they existed prior to 2000.

5-2-308. Regular schedule of payments - maximum loan term.

Supervised loans not made pursuant to a revolving credit account and in which the principal is three thousand dollars or less shall be scheduled to be payable in substantially equal installments at equal periodic intervals except to the extent that the schedule of payments is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the debtor and:

Over a period of not more than thirty-seven months if the principal is more than one thousand dollars; or

Over a period of not more than twenty-five months if the principal is one thousand dollars or less.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-511, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-309. Conduct of business other than making loans.

A supervised lender may not carry on any other business for the purpose of evasion or violation of this code nor may the supervised lender extend credit on the condition or requirement that the consumer obtain additional credit, goods, or services from the supervised lender or a person related to the supervised lender unless otherwise permitted by law.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-512, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For regulation of pawnbrokers, see article 11.9 of title 29.

5-2-310. Application of other provisions.

Except as otherwise provided, all provisions of this code applying to consumer loans apply to supervised loans.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-513, as it existed prior to 2000.